Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2705
Conditional grant approval; limits; conditions; State Historic Preservation Officer; powers; Nebraska Arts Council; approval required, when.

The department may conditionally approve grants of assistance from the fund to eligible and competitive applicants subject to the following limits and requirements:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this section and subsection (4) of section 13-2706, a grant request shall be in an amount meeting the following requirements:

(a) For a grant of assistance under section 13-2704.01, at least fifteen thousand dollars but no more than:

(i) For a city of the primary class or a tribal government, two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(ii) For a city with a population of at least forty thousand inhabitants but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, one million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars;

(iii) For a city with a population of at least twenty thousand inhabitants but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, seven hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(iv) For a city with a population of at least ten thousand inhabitants but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, six hundred thousand dollars; and

(v) For a municipality with a population of fewer than ten thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars; and

(b) For a grant of assistance under section 13-2704.02, at least three thousand dollars but no more than fifteen thousand dollars;

(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of section 13-2706, upon the balance of the fund reaching three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, and until the balance of the fund falls below one million five hundred thousand dollars, a grant request shall be in an amount meeting the following requirements:

(a) For a grant of assistance under section 13-2704.01, at least fifteen thousand dollars but no more than:

(i) For a city of the primary class or a tribal government, three million three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars;

(ii) For a city with a population of at least forty thousand inhabitants but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, one million six hundred eighty-seven thousand dollars;

(iii) For a city with a population of at least twenty thousand inhabitants but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, one million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars;

(iv) For a city with a population of at least ten thousand inhabitants but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, nine hundred thousand dollars; and

(v) For a municipality with a population of fewer than ten thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, five hundred sixty-two thousand dollars; and

(b) For a grant of assistance under section 13-2704.02, at least three thousand dollars but no more than fifteen thousand dollars;

(3) Assistance from the fund shall not amount to more than fifty percent of the cost of the project for which a grant is requested;

(4) An applicant shall not be awarded more than one grant of assistance under section 13-2704.01 and one grant of assistance under section 13-2704.02 in any two-year period;

(5) Any eligible facility for which a grant of assistance under section 13-2704.01 is made shall not be sold for at least five years following the award of such grant of assistance;

(6) An application for a grant of assistance to assist in the preservation, restoration, conversion, rehabilitation, demolition, or reuse of a historic building or district shall include:

(a) A notification of approval from the State Historic Preservation Officer that the work proposed in the application conforms to the United States Secretary of the Interior's Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties; or

(b) Documentation showing that preservation-based mitigation strategies have been agreed to by the applicant and the State Historic Preservation Officer; and

(7) An application for a grant of assistance to a municipality partnering with a certified creative district as provided in subsection (4) of section 13-2706 shall include a notification of approval from the Nebraska Arts Council that the work proposed in the application conforms to the council's standards. If the application does not include such notification of approval from the Nebraska Arts Council, the department shall not award a grant of assistance for such application.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 17;

Laws 2003, LB 385, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB789, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB297, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB153, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB940, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB67, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB564, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB927, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB883, § 3.
July 18, 2026